Massachusetts, session 194th, S459.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 edition, is hereby amended
by inserting after section 9B the following new section:-
Section 9C. The department shall administer the Access College Early (ACE) Program,
subject to appropriation, providing needs-based financial assistance for high school students
eligible for the Commonwealth Dual Enrollment Partnership (CDEP). Such assistance shall be
granted to students living in or attending high school in a gateway municipality, as defined in
section 3A of chapter 23A, and who also qualify for or receive free or reduced-price lunch under
the federally-funded school meals program. Students receiving financial assistance under the
ACE Program will participate in CDEP at no cost and may earn up to 24 college credits.
of 1